Utah statutes.
75-3-714.   Transactions authorized for personal representatives --
Exceptions.
Except as restricted or otherwise provided by this code, by the will or by an
order in a formal proceeding and subject to the priorities stated in Section
75-3-902, a personal representative, acting reasonably for the benefit of the
interested persons, may properly:
(1)  retain assets owned by the decedent pending distribution or liquidation
including those in which the representative is personally interested or which
are otherwise improper for trust investment;
(2)  receive assets from fiduciaries, or other sources;
(3)  perform, compromise, or refuse performance of the decedent's contracts
that continue as obligations of the estate, as he may determine under the
circumstances.  In performing enforceable contracts by the decedent to convey
or lease land, the personal representative, among other possible courses of
action, may:
(a)  execute and deliver a deed of conveyance for cash payment of all sums
remaining due or the purchaser's note for the sum remaining due secured by a
mortgage or deed of trust on the land; or
(b)  deliver a deed in escrow with directions that the proceeds, when paid in
accordance with the escrow agreement, be paid to the successors of the
decedent, as designated in the escrow agreement;
(4)  satisfy written charitable pledges of the decedent irrespective of
whether the pledges constituted binding obligations of the decedent or were
properly presented as claims, if in the judgment of the personal
representative the decedent would have wanted the pledges completed under the
circumstances;
(5)  if funds are not needed to meet debts and expenses currently payable and
are not immediately distributable, deposit or invest liquid assets of the
estate, including moneys received from the sale of other assets, in federally
insured interest-bearing accounts, readily marketable secured loan
arrangements, or other prudent investments which would be reasonable for use
by trustees generally;
(6)  acquire or dispose of an asset, including land in this or another state,
for cash or on credit, at public or private sale; and manage, develop,
improve, exchange, partition, change the character of, or abandon an estate
asset;
(7)  make ordinary or extraordinary repairs or alterations in buildings or
other structures, demolish any improvements, or raze existing or erect new
party walls or buildings;
(8)  subdivide, develop, or dedicate land to public use; make or obtain the
vacation of plats and adjust boundaries; adjust differences in valuation on
exchange or partition by giving or receiving considerations; or dedicate
easements to public use without consideration;
(9)  enter for any purpose into a lease as lessor or lessee, with or without
option to purchase or renew, for a term within or extending beyond the period
of administration;
(10)  enter into a lease or arrangement for exploration and removal of
minerals or other natural resources or enter into a pooling or unitization
agreement;
(11)  abandon property when, in the opinion of the personal representative, it
is valueless, is so encumbered, or is in condition that it is of no benefit to
the estate;
(12)  vote stocks or other securities in person or by general or limited
proxy;
(13)  pay calls, assessments, and other sums chargeable or accruing against or
on account of securities, unless barred by the provisions relating to claims;
(14)  hold a security in the name of a nominee or in other form without
disclosure of the interest of the estate but the personal representative is
liable for any act of the nominee in connection with the security so held;
(15)  insure the assets of the estate against damage, loss, and liability and
himself against liability as to third persons;
(16)  borrow money with or without security to be repaid from the estate
assets or otherwise; and advance money for the protection of the estate;
(17)  effect a fair and reasonable compromise with any debtor or obligor, or
extend, renew, or in any manner modify the terms of any obligation owing to
the estate.  If the personal representative holds a mortgage, pledge, or other
lien upon property of another person, he may, in lieu of foreclosure, accept a
conveyance or transfer of encumbered assets from the owner thereof in
satisfaction of the indebtedness secured by lien;
(18)  pay taxes, assessments, compensation of the personal representative, and
other expenses incident to the administration of the estate;
(19)  sell or exercise stock subscription or conversion rights; and consent,
directly or through a committee or other agent, to the reorganization,
consolidation, merger, dissolution, or liquidation of a corporation or other
business enterprise;
(20)  allocate items of income or expense to either estate income or
principal, as permitted or provided by law;
(21)  employ persons, including attorneys, auditors, investment advisers, or
agents, even if they are associated with the personal representative, to
advise or assist the personal representative in the performance of his
administrative duties; act without independent investigation upon their
recommendations; and instead of acting personally, employ one or more agents
to perform any act of administration, whether or not discretionary;
(22)  prosecute or defend claims or proceedings in any jurisdiction for the
protection of the estate and of the personal representative in the performance
of his duties;
(23)  sell, mortgage, or lease any real or personal property of the estate or
any interest in it for cash, credit, or for part cash and part credit, and
with or without security for unpaid balances;
(24)  continue any unincorporated business or venture in which the decedent
was engaged at the time of his death:
(a)  in the same business form for a period of not more than four months from
the date of appointment of a general personal representative if continuation
is a reasonable means of preserving the value of the business including good
will;
(b)  in the same business form for any additional period of time that may be
approved by order of the court in a formal proceeding to which the persons
interested in the estate are parties; or
(c)  throughout the period of administration if the business is incorporated
by the personal representative and if none of the probable distributees of the
business who are competent adults object to its incorporation and retention in
the estate;
(25)  incorporate any business or venture in which the decedent was engaged at
the time of his death;
(26)  provide for exoneration of the personal representative from personal
liability in any contract entered into on behalf of the estate;
(27)  satisfy and settle claims and distribute the estate as provided in this
code.
